Utah statutes.
73-12-1.   Governor authorized to convey to the United States lands or
interests in said lands in bed of or on margin of Utah Lake.
For the purpose of cooperating with and assisting the United States of America
in developing the water resources of this state, the governor of the state of
Utah is hereby authorized to grant and convey to the United States of America
by deed or deeds or other appropriate instrument or instruments such right,
title and interest which the state of Utah now has or which it may acquire in
and to the lands herein described, or of any part of the same, and/or to grant
and convey any easement or right of way in, upon or across any such state
lands as may be necessary or desirable in connection with the construction by
the United States of America of any storage reservoir, dike or dikes, and/or
other works for the development and use of water for irrigation and other
purposes; provided, that the governor shall not make any such grants or
conveyances until an agreement has been made by the United States of America
with a water users' association, and/or other entity or entities for the
construction of any of such works in connection with which is desired any
grant or conveyance provided for in this act.
